Louisiana, session 2026, HB131.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 930.4(B) and (C) are hereby amended
and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 930.5(C) is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
Art. 930.4. Jurisdictional bars to relief; repetitive applications
* * *
B. If the application alleges a claim of which the petitioner had knowledge
and inexcusably failed to raise in the proceedings leading to conviction, the court
shall deny relief.
C. If the application alleges a claim which the petitioner raised in the trial
court and inexcusably failed to pursue on appeal, the court shall deny relief.
* * *
Art. 930.5. Custody pending retrial; bail
* * *
C. The provisions of Paragraph B of this Article do not apply until a
judgment granting post-conviction relief becomes final. If relief is granted, the
effect of that judgment shall be stayed until either of the following occurs:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 131 ENROLLED
(1) The time period to invoke the supervisory jurisdiction of the Louisiana
Supreme Court has expired.
(2) The Louisiana Supreme Court, after receipt of a timely application, has
taken final action on the matter.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.